Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201179-903
Retirement system; established; purpose.

A school retirement system is hereby established for the
purpose of providing retirement allowances or other benefits for the school
employees of the State of Nebraska as provided in the School Employees Retirement
Act. It shall have the powers and privileges of a corporation, insofar as
may be necessary to carry out the act, shall be known as the School Employees Retirement System
of the State of Nebraska, and by such name shall transact all business as
provided in the act.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 2, p. 640;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2902;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 436, p. 842;

Laws 1967, c. 486, § 41, p. 1530;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 85, p. 2400;

Laws 1969, c. 735, § 2, p. 2777;

Laws 1971, LB 987, § 17;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 25;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1502;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 538;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 18.
July 1, 2011
For retirement system for employees of Class V school districts, see the Class V School Employees Retirement Act, section 79-978.01.